Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
CHAPTER 200 Assistance to Children

200.010.
Definitions.

As used in KRS Chapter 200, unless the context requires otherwise, “cabinet” means Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

History.
331e-24, 331L-20, 331m-3: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 1; 1946, ch. 98, § 1; 1950, ch. 110, § 12; 1956, ch. 157, § 17; 1960, ch. 33, § 12; 1966, ch. 255, § 192; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(1), (13); 1998, ch. 426, § 165, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 201, effective June 20, 2005.

200.020.
Eligibility for aid to dependent children — Amount — Duties of department. [Repealed.]

200.030.
Amount of aid. [Repealed.]

200.040.
Duties of Department of Welfare in assisting children. [Repealed.]

200.045.
Social security appropriations not to lapse at end of first fiscal year of biennium. [Renumbered.]

200.050.
Records to be confidential. [Repealed.]

200.060.
Right of appeal. [Repealed.]

200.070.
Aid not alienable or subject to levy. [Repealed.]

200.080.
Powers of cabinet in providing child welfare — Local agencies.

The cabinet shall do all things necessary to execute the duties required by KRS 200.080 to 200.120, and may adopt necessary rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of KRS 200.080 to 200.120.

The cabinet may assist in the establishment of county children’s bureaus, and shall cooperate with all agencies, institutions, and associations concerned with the welfare of children.

The cabinet may receive both real and personal property, by gift, devise, bequest, and conveyance, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of KRS 200.080 to 200.120. The cabinet may expend out of funds so received such sums as are necessary for the treatment of children committed to its care.

History.
331L-3, 331L-6, 331L-9, 331L-11: amend. Acts 1980, ch. 188, § 189, effective July 15, 1980.

200.090.
Children entitled to benefits.

All physically disabled, delinquent, neglected, dependent, mentally ill, or mentally disabled children, under eighteen (18) years of age, shall be included within the provisions of KRS 200.080 to 200.120, except children who are physically disabled in a way that prevents normal motion of limbs or body, solely and permanently blind, or solely and permanently deaf. The provisions of KRS 200.080 to 200.120 shall not apply to children whose specific disability or condition has already been provided for through an existing agency.

History.
331L-10: amend. Acts 1980, ch. 188, § 190, effective July 15, 1980; 1988, ch. 283, § 5, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 405, § 52, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 416, § 13, effective July 15, 1994.

200.100.
Cabinet to investigate status of children — Report to Governor. [Repealed]

History.
331L-7, 331L-8; 1994, ch. 405, § 53, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 416, § 14, effective July 15, 1994; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

200.110.
Commitment — Treatment — Payment of cost. [Repealed.]

200.115.
Cabinet or Department of Juvenile Justice authorized to pay for care and treatment of child committed to it — Payment by person having charge of child.

The cabinet or the Department of Juvenile Justice, as appropriate, is authorized and may pay for such care and treatment as it deems necessary for the well-being of any child committed to it, including medical expenses, room and board, clothing, and all other necessities for such children committed to its care and custody, but only if no similar services are rendered by other agencies.

Where the person having charge of the child is able to pay for the care or treatment or portions thereof, the court shall so direct and in what amounts, and such funds as he is able to pay shall be turned over to the cabinet or the Department of Juvenile Justice, as appropriate, or the person having custody and care of the child to be applied on the cost of the treatment and care of the child.

History.
Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 157, § 19; 1998, ch. 443, § 10, effective July 15, 1998.

200.120.
Transportation expenses may be paid.

The cabinet may pay the necessary traveling expenses of children committed to it for care and treatment from their homes to the institutions or homes to which they are committed, and the traveling expenses of such children from the institutions to their homes when discharged.

History.
331L-13.

200.130.
Fiscal court may appropriate funds. [Repealed.]

200.140.
County children’s bureau — Members — Terms — Compensation. [Repealed.]

200.150.
Executive secretaries of county bureaus. [Repealed.]

200.151.
Early childhood development fund — Purpose — Source of moneys — Strategic plan for fund distribution — Annual report and audit.

There is established in the State Treasury a fund to be known as the “Early Childhood Development Fund.” This fund shall exist for the purpose of receipt and expenditure of moneys to improve and promote early childhood development for children of the Commonwealth. The fund may receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds and shall be disbursed by the State Treasurer upon the warrant of the chair of the early childhood development board. Beginning July 1, 2000, twenty-five percent (25%) of the proceeds from the tobacco settlement agreement fund shall be deposited in this fund as provided under KRS 248.654. All investment income earned from moneys deposited in the fund shall accrue to the fund. The moneys in the fund shall not lapse at the close of any fiscal year but shall be carried forward in the next fiscal year for the purpose of the fund. The board shall develop and oversee the implementation of a strategic plan. The strategic plan shall identify both short-term and long-term goals and the appropriate oversights to measure progress toward achievement of those goals, and it shall be updated every two (2) years. The board shall submit an annual report to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission by September 1 of each year for the preceding fiscal year, outlining its activities and expenditures. The Auditor of Public Accounts, on an annual basis, shall conduct a thorough review of all expenditures from the fund and, if necessary in the opinion of the Auditor, an audit of the operations of the fund. No money in the fund shall be allocated until the board has adopted a strategic plan.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 546, § 3, effective April 26, 2000.

200.160.
Duty of county bureaus. [Repealed.]

200.170.
Aid to mothers with dependent children. [Repealed.]

200.180.
County bureau to investigate appliants for mother’s aid. [Repealed.]

200.190.
County bureau to make allowance for mother’s aid. [Repealed.]

200.200.
Allowance to be reviewed and changed. [Repealed.]

200.210.
County bureau to visit homes. [Repealed.]

200.220.
County bureau to keep confidential records. [Repealed.]

200.230.
Payments to be made directly to mother. [Repealed.]

200.240.
County mothers’ aid fund — Tax levy. [Repealed.]

200.250.
Kentucky crippled children commission — Members — Employees. [Repealed.]

200.260.
Commission may receive property and expend funds. [Repealed.]

200.270.
Commitment — Treatment — Payment of cost. [Repealed.]

200.280.
Transportation may be paid. [Repealed.]

200.290.
Report to Governor. [Repealed.]

200.300.
Appropriation by fiscal court — Expenditure — Reports. [Repealed.]

200.310.
Counties containing second-class city may support dependent children. [Repealed.]

200.320.
Children eligible for aid — Application — Procedure. [Repealed.]

200.330.
Appropriation by fiscal court for children’s aid. [Repealed.]

200.340.
Definitions for KRS 200.340 to 200.355. [Repealed.]

200.345.
Second-class cities authorized to contribute to support of dependent children. [Repealed.]

200.350.
Eligibility for city aid — Application — Affidavit and investigation. [Repealed.]

200.355.
Group payments — Regulations. [Repealed.]